District of Columbia statutes.
28:10-104

Laws not repealed.

(1)

The article on documents of title (article 7) does not repeal or modify any laws prescribing the form or contents of documents of title or the services or facilities to be afforded by bailees, or otherwise regulating bailees’ businesses in respects not specifically dealt with herein; but the fact that such laws are violated does not affect the status of a document of title which otherwise complies with the definition of a document of title (section 28:1-201).

(2)

Repealed.

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 769, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-240, § 3(s), 44 DCR 1087

This section subordinates the Article of this Act on Documents of Title (Article 7) to the more specialized regulations of particular classes of bailees under other legislation and international treaties. Particularly, the provisions of that Article are superseded by applicable inconsistent provisions regarding the obligation of carriers and the limitation of their liability found in federal legislation dealing with transportation by water (including the Harter Act, Act of February 13, 1893, 27 Stat. 445, and the Carriage of Goods by Sea Act, Act of April 16, 1936, 49 Stat. 1207); the Warsaw Convention on International Air Transportation, 49 Stat. 3000, and Section 20(11) of the Interstate Commerce Act, Act of February 20, 1887, 24 Stat. 386, as amended. The Documents of Title provisions of this Act supplement such legislation largely in matters other than obligation of the bailee, e.g., form and effects of negotiation, procedure in the case of lost documents, effect of overissue, possibility of rapid transmission.

Doubts have been expressed whether Article 8 provides as complete protection on transfers of securities by fiduciaries as the Uniform Act for the Simplification of Fiduciary Security Transfers. The Editorial Board entirely favors the policy of simplifying fiduciary security transfers and believes that Article 8 soundly implements this policy. However, since the shorter Simplification Act has been so widely enacted and has been working satisfactorily, the Editorial Board recommends that it be retained.

Cross Reference:Section 7-103.

1973 Ed., § 28:10-104.
1981 Ed., § 28:10-104.
This section is referenced in § 28:10-103.